Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-618.01
Expressway, defined.

Expressway shall mean a divided arterial highway designed primarily for through traffic with full or partial control of access which may have grade separations at intersections.

Laws 1996, LB 901, § 5.